Washington statutes.
RCW 19.98.140

Actions against suppliers—Remedies.

Any equipment dealer may bring an action against a supplier in any court of competent jurisdiction for damages sustained by the equipment dealer as a consequence of the supplier's violation including requiring the supplier to repurchase at fair market value any data processing hardware and specialized repair tools and equipment previously purchased pursuant to requirements of the supplier, compensation for any loss of business, and the actual costs of the action, including reasonable attorneys' fees. The equipment dealer may also be granted injunctive relief against unlawful termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, or substantial change in competitive circumstances. The remedies set forth in this action shall not be deemed exclusive and shall be in addition to any other remedies permitted by law. Nothing in this section is intended to prevent any court from awarding to the supplier actual costs of the action, including reasonable attorney's fees if the action is deemed frivolous.

[ 1990 c 124 s 5.]